North Carolina, session 2025, HB327.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of sixteen million five hundred sixty-four thousand dollars
($16,564,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
the Town of Hope Mills for the following capital projects:
(1) Thirteen million one hundred thirty-four thousand dollars ($13,134,000) for
the construction of a new community center.
(2) Three million four hundred thirty thousand dollars ($3,430,000) to design and
renovate the Hope Mills Senior Center to make it ADA compliant.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H327-v-1*